Massachusetts, session 194th, H5473.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 20 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, section
7E of chapter 81 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the
secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation or their designee, shall convey to
the Fall River Redevelopment Authority certain parcels of land, owned by the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation, containing 21.55 acres, more or less, of vacant land, previously
taken and used for highway purposes.
(b)(1) The parcels conveyed pursuant to subsection (a) shall be further described as
bounded by: (i) Davol street northbound on the east; and (ii) Davol street southbound on the
west. The northern limit of the parcels shall be Brightman street and the southern limit shall be
Turner street in the city of Fall River.
(2) Included in the parcels pursuant to subsection (a) shall be the parcels between: (i)
Turner street and Hathway street; (ii) Hathway street and President avenue; (iii) President avenue
of 5

and Brightman street; and (iv) the northern portion of Lindsey street that is bordered by
Brightman street in the North and Davol street north in the city of Fall River
(3) Said parcels shall be fully described in a survey to be prepared and approved by the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation and filed by the secretary of the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation or their designee, with the house and senate committees on ways
and means not later than 180 days after the effective date of this act.
(c) The conveyance pursuant to subsection (a) shall be subject to adequate compensation
pursuant to section 3 and agreed to by the secretary of the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation or their designee and the executive director of the Fall River Redevelopment
Authority.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding chapter 121B of the General Laws or any other general
or special law to the contrary, the Fall River Redevelopment Authority may purchase from the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation certain parcels of land described in section 1
subject to terms acceptable to the parties.
(b)(1) The Fall River Redevelopment Authority, after purchase pursuant to subsection
(a), may develop, sell or lease the parcels of land for residential, retail, commercial, restaurant
and other economic development purposes, under the approved Fall River Waterfront Urban
Renewal Plan, approved by the executive office of housing and livable communities in August
2019.
(2) Any parcels transferred pursuant to this section shall not need to adopt or adhere to an
urban renewal plan, as defined in section 1 of chapter 121B of the General Laws and the Fall
River Redevelopment Authority shall enjoy the statutory authority it would possess for land and
of 5

structures and other property within an urban renewal project as defined by said section 1 of said
chapter 121B.
SECTION 3. The consideration for the conveyance, pursuant to section 1, shall be
nominal consideration of $1.00, to be paid by the Fall River Redevelopment Authority, for the
initial transfer of the parcels of land from the Massachusetts Department of Transportation to the
Fall River Redevelopment Authority. The parcels shall be conveyed in their present condition, as
is, where is and with all faults, through the Massachusetts Department of Transportation’s
standard form release deed.
SECTION 4. The net proceeds of all land sales or lease pursuant to section 2 shall be
deposited in the Massachusetts Transportation Trust Fund and not less than $10,000,000 shall be
utilized by the Fall River Redevelopment Authority to offset transportation related purposes for
the construction of an expandable 200 space off-street public and private use parking garage and
expenditures for the maintenance of sidewalks, shared use paths and other projects eligible for
funding as described in the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991, P.L. 102-
240.
SECTION 5. An independent appraisal of the future fair market value for any sale or
lease of the parcels to be conveyed pursuant to section 2 shall be prepared in accordance with the
usual and customary professional appraisal practices by a qualified appraiser commissioned by
the Fall River Redevelopment Authority and submitted to the secretary of the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation. Within 30 days of the receipt of the appraisal, the secretary of the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall review and approve the appraisal, and the
review shall include an examination of the methodology utilized for the appraisal. The secretary
of 5

shall submit the appraisal to the inspector general for review and comment. The inspector
general shall review and approve the appraisal and the review shall include an examination of the
methodology utilized for the appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a report and file the
report with the secretary and the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance.
Not less than 15 days prior to the execution of documents effecting the transfers described in
section 2, the secretary shall submit copies of the appraisal and the inspector general’s report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on state
administration and regulatory oversight.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Fall River
Redevelopment Authority shall be responsible for all upfront costs and expenses associated with
the conveyance authorized in section 1 including, but not limited to, all costs associated with any
engineering, surveys, appraisals and deed preparation as such costs may be determined by the
secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation netted out of the proceeds from the
sale pursuant to section 2. Net proceeds shall be deposited in the Massachusetts Transportation
Trust Fund.
SECTION 7. In the event that the parcels of land comprising 21.55 acres, more or less,
described in section 1 and conveyed pursuant to section 2 cease to be used by the Fall River
Redevelopment Authority, the developers selected and any other subsequent owners for the
purposes described in section 2 at any time then, upon notice by the secretary of the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation or their designee, said undeveloped parcels of land
shall revert to the Massachusetts Department of Transportation. Should said parcels of land
comprising the 21.55 acres, more or less, revert to the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation, any further disposition thereof shall be subject to section 20 of chapter 6C of the
of 5

General Laws and section 7E of chapter 81 of the General Laws and to the prior approval of the
general court.
SECTION 8. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 5